incubator/apertium-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="/मैं__प्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मैं</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मैंने</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मुझे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मुझको</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मुझसे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मुझमें</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मुझपर</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हम</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमने</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमें</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमको</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमसे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हममें</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमपर</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरा</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>मेरी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारा</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारे</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हमारी</l>
          <r>मैं<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="मैं"><i></i><par n="/मैं__प्"/></e>
